District of Columbia statutes.
19-316

Share of children born out of wedlock; their heirs; mother; father.

Children born out of wedlock and the heirs of children born out of wedlock are capable of taking real and personal estate by inheritance from their mother or from their father if parenthood has been established, or from each other, or from heirs of each other, as the case may be, in like manner as if born in lawful wedlock, and the mother and such father, and their respective heirs, are capable of inheriting from such children.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 22(a), (c), 23 DCR 2544
June 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-78, § 2, 24 DCR 9282
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 204(c), 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-316.
1973 Ed., § 19-316.